Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,106
Health maintenance organization producer, defined.

Health maintenance organization producer shall mean a person licensed under subdivision (1)(b) of section 44-4054 who solicits, negotiates, effects, procures, delivers, renews, or continues a policy or contract for health maintenance organization membership, or who takes or transmits a membership fee or premium for such a policy or contract, other than for himself or herself, or who advertises or otherwise holds himself or herself out to the public as such.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 15;

Laws 2008, LB855, § 20.